Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3163
Caregiver Tax Credit Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3163 to 77-3166 shall be known and may be cited as the Caregiver Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 56.